Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska15-251
Officers and employees; bonds or insurance.

A city of the primary class may require all officers or employees elected or appointed to give bond or evidence of equivalent insurance for the faithful performance of their duties. No officer shall become surety upon the official bond of another or upon any contractor's bond, license, or appeal bond given to the city or under any ordinance thereof. It shall be optional with such officers to give a surety or guaranty company bond.

Laws 1901, c. 16, § 129, LI, p. 140;

R.S.1913, § 4461;

C.S.1922, § 3846;

C.S.1929, § 15-249;

R.S.1943, § 15-251;

Laws 1961, c. 37, § 2, p. 163;

Laws 2007, LB347, § 4.